Utah statutes.
39-4-10.   Oaths of force officers.

The oath to be taken by officers commissioned in the forces shall be substantially in the form prescribed for officers of the National Guard, but substituting the words Utah State Defense Force, where necessary.



Amended by Chapter 210, 1988 General Session

